District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.51b

Annual comparative review.

(a)

In general. —

The Council of the District of Columbia shall annually review and adjust the amount of the monthly assistance payment that may be made under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program so that such payment is comparable with the monthly assistance payments made under such program in Maryland and Virginia counties that are contiguous to the District of Columbia.

(b)

Effective date. —

Subsection (a) shall apply with respect to fiscal year 1998 and each succeeding fiscal year.

History

Nov. 19, 1997, 111 Stat. 2185, Pub. L. 105-100, § 153

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 4-205.51a
1981 Ed., § 3-205.51a.